Utah statutes.
53-6-211.   Revocation, suspension, or refusal of certification -- Hearings
-- Grounds -- Notice to employer -- Reporting.
(1) (a)  The director may, upon the concurrence of the majority of the
council, revoke, refuse, or suspend certification of a peace officer for
cause.
(b) Except as provided under Subsection (6), the council shall give the person
or peace officer involved prior notice and an opportunity for a full hearing
before the council.
(c)  The director, with the concurrence of the council, may by rule designate
a presiding officer to represent the council in adjudicative proceedings or
hearings before the council.
(d)  Any of the following constitute cause for action under Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  willful falsification of any information to obtain certified status;
(ii)  physical or mental disability affecting the employee's ability to
perform his duties;
(iii)  addiction to or the unlawful sale, possession, or use of narcotics,
drugs, or drug paraphernalia;
(iv)  conviction of a felony or any crime involving dishonesty, unlawful
sexual conduct, physical violence, or driving under the influence of alcohol
or drugs; or
(v)  any conduct or pattern of conduct that would tend to disrupt, diminish,
or otherwise jeopardize public trust and fidelity in law enforcement.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding any expungement statute or rule of any other
jurisdiction, any conviction obtained in this state or other jurisdiction may
be considered for purposes of this section.
(b)  In this section, "conviction" includes a conviction that has been
expunged, dismissed, or treated in a similar manner to either of these
procedures.
(c)  This provision applies to convictions entered both before and after April
25, 1988.
(3)  The director shall send notice to the governing body of the political
subdivision employing the peace officer and shall receive information or
comments concerning the peace officer from the governing body or the agency
employing the officer before suspending or revoking that peace officer's
certification.
(4)  Denial, suspension, or revocation procedures may not be initiated by the
council when an officer is terminated for infraction of his agency's policies,
general orders, or similar guidelines of operation that do not amount to any
of the causes for denial, suspension, or revocation enumerated in Subsection
(1).
(5) (a)  Termination of a peace officer, whether voluntary or involuntary,
does not preclude revocation or subsequent denial of peace officer
certification status by the council if the peace officer was terminated for
any of the reasons under Subsection (1).
(b)  Employment by another agency, or reinstatement of a peace officer by his
parent agency after termination, whether the termination was voluntary or
involuntary, does not preclude revocation or subsequent denial of peace
officer certification status by the council if the peace officer was
terminated for any of the reasons under Subsection (1).
(6) (a)  When the cause for action is conviction of a felony, the proceedings
prior to a recommendation shall be limited to an informal review of written
documentation by the presiding officer.
(b)  If the presiding officer determines that the peace officer has been
convicted of a felony, then the presiding officer shall recommend revocation.
(c)  The peace officer may request an informal hearing before the presiding
officer solely to present evidence that there was no felony conviction.
(d)  At the conclusion of an informal hearing, the presiding officer shall
make a recommendation to the director and the council.
(7)  The chief, sheriff, or administrative officer of a law enforcement agency
is required to report to Peace Officer Standards and Training all conduct of
employees who are peace officers, as provided in Subsection (1)(d) above.
